Hawaii statutes.
§454M-8.5 Investigation and examination
authority. (a) In addition to any other authority under this chapter, the
commissioner shall have the authority to conduct investigations and
examinations in accordance with this section. The commissioner may access,
receive, and use any books, accounts, records, files, documents, information,
or evidence that the commissioner deems relevant to the inquiry or
investigation, regardless of the location, possession, control, or custody of
the documents, information, or evidence.

(b) For the purposes of investigating
violations or complaints arising under this chapter, or for the purposes of
examination, the commissioner may review, investigate, or examine any licensee
or person subject to this chapter, as often as necessary to carry out the
purposes of this chapter. The commissioner may direct, subpoena, or order the
attendance of, and examine under oath, all persons whose testimony may be
required about loans or the business or subject matter of any examination or
investigation and may direct, subpoena, or order the person to produce books,
accounts, records, files, and any other documents the commissioner deems
relevant to the inquiry.

(c) Each licensee or person subject to this
chapter shall provide to the commissioner upon request the books and records
relating to the operations of the licensee or person subject to this chapter. The
commissioner shall have access to the books and records and shall be permitted
to interview the officers, principals, mortgage servicers employees,
independent contractors, agents, and customers of the licensee or person
subject to this chapter concerning their business.

(d) Each licensee or person subject to this
chapter shall make or compile reports or prepare other information as directed
by the commissioner in order to carry out the purposes of this section,
including:

(1) Accounting compilations;

(2) Information lists and data concerning loan
transactions in a format prescribed by the commissioner; or

(3) Other information that the commissioner deems
necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

(e) In conducting any examination or
investigation authorized by this chapter, the commissioner may control access
to any documents and records of the licensee or person under examination or
investigation. The commissioner may take possession of the documents and
records or place a person in exclusive charge of the documents and records.
During the period of control, no person shall remove or attempt to remove any
of the documents and records except pursuant to a court order or with the
consent of the commissioner. Unless the commissioner has reasonable grounds to
believe the documents or records of the licensee or person under examination or
investigation have been, or are at risk of being, altered or destroyed for
purposes of concealing a violation of this chapter, the licensee or owner of
the documents and records shall have access to the documents or records as
necessary to conduct its ordinary business affairs.

(f) To carry out the purposes of this chapter,
the commissioner may:

(1) Retain accountants or other professionals and
specialists, who may be exempt from chapter 76, as examiners, auditors, or
investigators to conduct or assist in the conduct of examinations or
investigations;

(2) Enter into agreements or relationships with other
government officials or regulatory associations in order to improve
efficiencies and reduce regulatory burden by sharing resources, standardized or
uniform methods or procedures, and documents, records, information, or evidence
obtained under this section;

(3) Use, hire, contract, or employ public or
privately available analytical systems, methods, or software to examine or
investigate the licensee or person subject to this chapter;

(4) Accept and rely on examination or investigation
reports made by other government officials, within or without this State; and

(5) Accept audit reports made by an independent
certified public accountant for the licensee or person subject to this chapter
in the course of that part of the examination covering the same general subject
matter as the audit and may incorporate the audit report in the report of the
examination, report of investigation, or other writing of the commissioner.

(g) The authority of this section shall remain
in effect, whether a licensee or person subject to this chapter acts or claims
to act under any licensing or registration law of this State, or claims to act
without such authority.

(h) No licensee or person subject to investigation
or examination under this section may knowingly withhold, abstract, remove,
mutilate, destroy, or secrete any books, records, computer records, or other
information.

(i) The commissioner may charge an examination
or investigation fee, payable to the commissioner, based upon the cost per hour
per examiner for all licensees and persons subject to this chapter examined or
investigated by the commissioner or the commissioner's staff. The hourly fee
shall be $60 or an amount as the commissioner shall establish by rule pursuant
to chapter 91. In addition to the examination or investigation fee, the
commissioner may charge any person who is examined or investigated by the
commissioner or the commissioner's staff pursuant to this section additional
amounts for travel, per diem, mileage, and other reasonable expenses incurred
in connection with the examination or investigation, payable to the
commissioner.

(j) Any person having reason to believe that
this chapter or the rules adopted pursuant thereto have been violated, or that
a license issued under this chapter should be suspended or revoked, may file a
written complaint with the commissioner setting forth the details of the
alleged violation or grounds for suspension or revocation. [L 2013, c 92, §1; am
L 2016, c 122, §25]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next